Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-189
Satisfactory evidence of ownership, defined.

Satisfactory evidence of ownership means any of the following:

(1) The brands, tattoos, or marks on the livestock;

(2) Any approved nonvisual identifiers;

(3) The point of origin of livestock;

(4) The physical description of the livestock;

(5) Any documentary evidence, including bills of sale, brand clearance, certificates of inspection, breed registration certificates, animal health or testing certificates, genomic testing certificates, recorded brand certificates, purchase sheets, scale tickets, disclaimers of interest, affidavits, court orders, security agreements, powers of attorney, canceled checks, bills of lading, or tags; and

(6) Any other facts, statements, or circumstances that taken in whole or in part cause an inspector to believe that proof of ownership is established.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 20;

Laws 2017, LB600, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB572, § 15;

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 8.
July 18, 2026